Maine, session 132, LD736.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Scholarship program. The Maine Maritime Academy shall create the
Workforce Development Scholarship Program to provide scholarships in an amount not to
exceed $1,250 for each student for a minimum of 115 students at the academy to assist
those students in earning the initial credits necessary to work at a state, municipal, private
or quasi-public ferry service operator located in and serving residents of the State.
Sec. 2. Operator consultation. The Maine Maritime Academy shall consult with
the Maine State Ferry Service or a state, municipal, private or quasi-public ferry service
operator located in and serving residents of the State in the development and
implementation of the Workforce Development Scholarship Program under section 1 for
the purposes of aligning operator needs with applicant training. The Maine Maritime
Academy and one or more ferry service operators shall jointly develop a method for
processing applications that allows flexibility for operator administrative capacities.